North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 15. North Carolina Consumer Finance Act.
§ 53-180.
Limitations and prohibitions on practices and agreements.

Time and Payment Limitation. — Every loan contract shall provide for repayment of the amount loaned in substantially equal installments, either of principal or of principal and charges in the aggregate, at approximately equal periodic intervals of time. Nothing contained herein shall prevent a loan being considered a new loan because the proceeds of the loan are used to pay an existing contract.

No Assignment of Earnings. — A licensee may not take an assignment of earnings of the borrower for payment or as security for payment of a loan. An assignment of earnings in violation of this section is unenforceable by the assignee of the earnings and is revocable by the borrower. A sale of unpaid earnings made in consideration of the payment of money to or for the account of the seller of the earnings is deemed to be a loan to the seller by an assignment of earnings.

Limitation on Default Provisions. — An agreement between a licensee and a borrower pursuant to a loan under this Article with respect to default by the borrower is enforceable only to the extent that (i) the borrower fails to make a payment as required by the agreement or fails to maintain contractually required insurance coverage or (ii) the prospect of payment, performance, or realization of collateral is significantly endangered or impaired, the burden of establishing the prospect of a significant endangerment or impairment being on the licensee.

Prohibitions on Discrimination. — No licensee shall deny any extension of credit or discriminate in the fixing of the amount, duration, application procedures or other terms or conditions of such extension of credit because of the race, color, religion, national origin, sex or marital status of the applicant or any other person connected with the transaction.

Limitation on Attorney’s Fees. — With respect to a loan made pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 53-176

, the agreement may not provide for payment by the borrower of attorney fees.

No Real Property as Security. — No licensee shall make any loan within this State which shall in any way be secured by real property.

Deceptive Acts or Practices. — No licensee shall engage in any unfair method of competition or unfair or deceptive trade practices in the conduct of making loans to borrowers pursuant to this Article or in collecting or attempting to collect any money alleged to be due and owing by a borrower.

Limitations on Home Loans. — No affiliate operating in the same office or subsidiary operating in the same office of a licensee shall make any home loan as defined in

G.S. 24-1.1

A(e) in a principal amount of less than three thousand dollars ($3,000).

Limitation on Conditions to Making Loans. — A licensee or an affiliate operating in the same office or subsidiary operating in the same office of a licensee shall not make as a condition of any loan the refinancing of a borrower’s home loan as defined in

G.S. 24-1.1

A(e) which is not currently in default.

No Solicitation of Deposits. — No licensee may directly or indirectly solicit from any borrower funds to be held on deposit in any bank; provided, however, a borrower may at his option, by way of a military allotment or other such program, designate a depository to receive and disburse funds for a designated purpose.

Loans made pursuant to this Article solicited using a facsimile or negotiable check shall be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 75-20(a)

.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, s. 24; 1973, c. 1042, s. 7; 1979, c. 33, s. 3; 1981, c. 464, s. 3; 1985, c. 154, ss. 10-12; 1987, c. 444, s. 3; 1989, c. 17, ss. 8, 13; 2001-519, s. 5; 2013-162, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-162, s. 6, effective July 1, 2013, deleted the first sentence of subsection (a) which read: “Except as otherwise provided in this Article, no licensee making a loan pursuant to

G.S. 53-173

shall enter into any contract of loan under this Article providing for any scheduled repayment of principal more than 25 months from the date of making the contract if the cash advance is six hundred dollars ($600.00) or less; more than 37 months from the date of making the contract if the cash advance is in excess of six hundred dollars ($600.00) but not in excess of fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500); more than 49 months from the date of making the contract if the cash advance is in excess of fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) but not in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500); or more than 61 months if the cash advance is in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).”; added “or fails to maintain contractually required insurance coverage” in subsection (c); and substituted “G.S. 53-176” for “G.S. 53-173” in subsection (e).

§ 53-180.1.
Military service members limitation.

Definition. — For purposes of this section, the term “covered military service member” means a member of the Armed Forces who is either (i) on active duty under a call or order that does not specify a period of 30 days or fewer or (ii) on active Guard and Reserve Duty, as that term is defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101(d)(6), with a rank of E4 or below.

Requirements for Granting Loan. — A licensee may not make a loan to a borrower who is a covered military service member unless the following requirements are met:

The licensee notifies the borrower’s commanding officer or executive officer before the loan is consummated. Notification may occur verbally, by electronic means, United States mail, or other equivalent methods of notification. The notification method and date shall be recorded in writing and included in the loan file along with the name of the commanding officer or executive officer communicated with and the date of the communication with the commanding officer or executive officer.

The licensee shall deposit in the United States mail a copy of the federal Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1601, et seq., disclosures and the complete contract for the loan addressed to the borrower’s commanding officer or executive officer within five business days of the consummation of the loan.

A covered military service member who has entered into a loan contract made pursuant to this Article may, within 30 days of entering into the loan contract, rescind the loan contract by returning to the licensee in cash or by certified bank check the amount advanced to or for the benefit of the covered military service member under the loan contract, and upon delivery of those funds to the licensee, the borrower shall have no further liability or obligations under the loan contract. Nothing in this provision shall be construed to restrict or eliminate any other penalties provided by State or federal law.

The licensee shall give the covered military service member a separate disclosure that includes the statements and information required under G.S. 53-181(a). The licensee shall include the name and address of the North Carolina Commissioner of Banks, the Consumer Protection Division of the North Carolina Department of Justice, and the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau. The licensee may include internal compliance information on the same disclosure.

Notwithstanding section 2 of Title 9 of the United States Code, 9 U.S.C. § 2, or any other federal or State law, rule, or regulation, no agreement to arbitrate any dispute involving the extension of consumer credit shall be enforceable against any covered military service member or dependent of such a covered military service member or any person who was a covered military service member or dependent of that covered military service member when the agreement was made.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-179, s. 4, effective September 1, 2015.

(b1)

Reasonable Precaution to Identify Covered Military Service Members. —

A licensee shall take reasonable precaution to prevent making loans in violation of this section. In the event that a licensee does not take reasonable precaution to identify covered military service members prior to making such a loan, such loans granted to covered military service members shall have the interest rate on the loan adjusted to eight percent (8%) per annum. Reasonable precaution may include obtaining a certificate from the Department of Defense Manpower Data Center (DMDC) that specifies whether the prospective borrower is or is not a member of the armed forces, a copy of the covered military service member’s most recent leave and earnings statement, verification of borrower(s) income or any additional method approved by the Commissioner of Banks. In the event the DMDC system is down, the licensee shall obtain a computer screen copy of the failed request. Provided however, nothing in this section shall be construed to require covered military service member confirmation for a borrower with whom a licensee has an established customer relationship, or for a borrower who provides verification from the borrower’s most recent payroll or and earnings statement, or verification of income clearly indicating that the borrower is not a covered military service member.

Penalties and Remedies. —

The remedies and rights provided under this section are in addition to and do not preclude any remedy otherwise available under law to the person claiming relief under this section, including any incidental, consequential, or punitive damages.

Any credit agreement, promissory note, or other contract prohibited under this section is null and void.

Nothing in this section may be construed to limit or otherwise affect the applicability of section 207 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. App. § 527.

Additional Restriction. — When a military servicemember has been deployed to a theater of combat, combat supporting role, an area where hostile fire and/or when Imminent Danger Pay is authorized to the servicemember, a licensee shall not contact the military servicemember or member’s spouse by telephone or electronic mail for purposes of collecting on the loan upon receiving sufficient proof of the military servicemember’s deployment. An official copy of the military service member’s orders for deployment or written verification from the servicemember’s commanding officer shall constitute sufficient proof.

History.

2013-162, s. 7; 2015-179, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-179, s. 4, effective September 1, 2015, in subsection (a), substituted “covered military” for “military” and added “with a rank of E4 or below”; rewrote subsection (b); and added subsection (b1).

§ 53-181.
Statements and information to be furnished to borrowers; power of attorney or confession of judgment prohibited.

Contents of Statement Furnished to Borrower. — At the time a loan is made, the licensee shall deliver to the borrower, or if there be two or more borrowers, to one of them a copy of the loan contract, or a written statement, showing in clear and distinct terms:

The name and address of the licensee and one of the primary obligors on the loan;

The date of the loan contract;

Schedule of installments or descriptions thereof;

The cash advance;

The face amount of the note evidencing the loan;

The amount collected or paid for insurance, if any;

The amount collected or paid for filing or other fees allowed by this Article;

The collateral or security for the loan;

If the loan refinances a previous loan, the following relating to the refinanced loan: (i) the principal balance due; (ii) interest charged that is included in the new loan; and (iii) rebates on any credit insurance, listed separately.

In addition to any disclosures otherwise provided by law, a licensee soliciting loans using a facsimile or negotiable check shall provide the disclosures required by

G.S. 75-20(a)

.

Schedule of Charges, etc., to Be Made Available; Copy Filed with Commissioner. — Each licensee doing business in North Carolina shall make readily available to the borrower at each place of business such full and accurate schedule of charges and insurance premiums, including refunds and rebates, on all classes of loans currently being made by such licensee, as the Commissioner shall prescribe, and a copy thereof shall be filed in the office of the Commissioner of Banks.

Power of Attorney or Confession of Judgment Prohibited. — No licensee shall take any confession of judgment or permit any borrower to execute a power of attorney in favor of any licensee or in favor of any third person to confess judgment or to appear for the borrower in any judicial proceeding and any such confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess judgment shall be absolutely void.

History.

1955, c. 1279; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1989, c. 17, s. 9; 2001-519, s. 6.

§ 53-182.
Payment of loans; receipts.

After each payment made on account of any loan, the licensee shall give to the person making such payment a signed, dated receipt showing the amount paid and the balance due on the loan. No receipt shall be required in the case of payments made by the borrower’s check or money order, where the entire proceeds of the check or money order are applied to the loan. The use of a coupon book system shall be deemed in compliance with this section.

Upon payment of any loan in full, a licensee shall cancel and return to the borrower, within a reasonable length of time, originals or copies of any note, assignment, mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument securing such loan, which no longer secures any indebtedness of the borrower to the licensee.

History.

1955, c. 1279; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 2001-519, s. 7.

§ 53-183.
Advertising, broadcasting, etc., false or misleading statements.

No licensee subject to this Article shall advertise, display, distribute, telecast, or broadcast or cause or permit to be advertised, displayed, distributed, telecasted, or broadcasted, in any manner whatsoever, any false, misleading, or deceptive statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions of loans. The Commissioner may require that charges or rates of charge, if stated by a licensee, be stated fully and clearly in such manner as he may deem necessary to prevent misunderstanding thereof by prospective borrowers. The Commissioner may permit or require licensees to refer in their advertising to the fact that their business is under State supervision, subject to conditions imposed by him to prevent an erroneous impression as to the scope or degree of protection provided by this Article.

History.

1957, c. 1429, s. 3; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1.

§ 53-184.
Securing of information; records and reports; allocations of expense.

Each licensee shall maintain all books and records relating to loans made under this Article required by the Commissioner of Banks to be kept, and the Commissioner, his deputy, or duly authorized examiner or agent or employee is authorized and empowered to examine such records at any reasonable time. Such books and records may be maintained in the form of magnetic tape, magnetic disk, optical disk, or other form of computer, electronic or microfilm media available for examination on the basis of computer printed reproduction, video display or other medium acceptable to the Commissioner of Banks; provided, however, that such books and records so kept must be convertible into clearly legible tangible documents within a reasonable time. Any licensee having more than one licensed office may maintain such books and records at a location other than the licensed office location if such location is approved by the Commissioner; provided that, upon such requirements as may be imposed by the Commissioner of Banks, there shall be available to the borrower at each licensed location or such other location convenient to the borrower, as designated by the licensee, complete loan information; and provided further that such books and records of each licensed office shall be clearly segregated. When a licensee maintains its books and records outside of North Carolina, the licensee shall make them available for examination at the place where they are maintained and shall pay for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the Commissioner in conducting such examination. Where the data processing for any licensee is performed by a person other than the licensee, the licensee shall provide to the Commissioner of Banks a copy of a binding agreement between the licensee and the data processor which allows the Commissioner of Banks, his deputy, or duly authorized examiner or agent or employee to examine that particular data processor’s activities pertaining to the licensee to the same extent as if such services were being performed by the licensee on its own premises; and, notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 53-167

, when billed by the Commissioner of Banks, the licensee shall reimburse the Commissioner of Banks for all costs and expenses incurred by the Commissioner in such examination.

Each licensee shall file annually with the Commissioner of Banks on or before the thirty-first day of March for the 12 months’ period ending the preceding December 31, reports on forms prescribed by the Commissioner. Reports shall disclose in detail and under appropriate headings the assets and liabilities of the licensee, the income, expense, gain, loss, and any other information as the Commissioner may require. Reports shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of the owner, manager, president, vice-president, cashier, secretary or treasurer of the licensee.

If a licensee conducts another business or is affiliated with other licensees under this Article, or if any other situation exists under which allocations of expense are necessary, the licensee or licensees shall make such allocation according to appropriate and reasonable accounting principles.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-285, s. 3, effective January 1, 1998.

History.

1955, c. 1279; 1957, c. 1429, s. 4; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1981, c. 561, s. 8; 1983, c. 68, s. 1; 1989, c. 17, s. 10; 1997-285, ss. 2, 3; 2001-519, s. 8; 2012-56, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 12, effective October 1, 2012, deleted “and 53-122” following “G.S. 53-167” near the end of subsection (a).

§ 53-185.
Rules and regulations by Banking Commission and Commissioner.

The State Banking Commission is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to make all rules and regulations deemed by the Commission to be necessary in implementing this Article and in providing for the protection of the borrowing public and the efficient management of such licensees and to give all necessary instructions to such licensees for the purpose of interpreting this Article; provided, the Commissioner is hereby authorized to make such rules and regulations and issue such orders as he deems necessary and desirable in implementing and carrying out the provisions of

G.S. 53-184

. And it shall be the duty of all such licensees, their officers, agents and employees, to comply fully with all such rules, regulations and instructions. When promulgated, any rule or regulation shall be forwarded by mail to each licensee at its licensed place of business at least 20 days prior to its effective date.

History.

1955, c. 1279; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1.

§ 53-186.
Commissioner to issue subpoenas, conduct hearings, give publicity to investigations, etc.

The Commissioner of Banks shall have the power and duty to issue subpoenas including subpoenas duces tecum, and compel attendance of witnesses, administer oaths, conduct hearings and transcribe testimony in making the investigations and conducting the hearings provided for herein or in the other discharge of his duties, and to give such publicity to his investigations and findings as he may deem best for the public interest.

History.

1957, c. 1429, s. 5; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1.

§ 53-187.
Injunctive powers; receivers.

Whenever the Commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that any person is violating or is threatening to violate any provision of this Article, he may in addition to all actions provided for in this Article, and without prejudice thereto, enter an order requiring such person to desist or to refrain from such violation; and an action may be brought in the name of the Commissioner on the relation of the State of North Carolina to enjoin such person from engaging in or continuing such violation or from doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof. In any such action an order or judgment may be entered awarding such preliminary or final injunction as may be deemed proper. In addition to all other means provided by law for the enforcement of a restraining order or injunction, the court in which such action is brought shall have power and jurisdiction to impound, and to appoint a receiver for the property and business of the defendant, including books, papers, documents and records pertaining thereto or so much thereof as the court may deem reasonably necessary to prevent violations of this Article through or by means of the use of said property and business. Such receiver, when appointed and qualified, shall have such powers and duties as to custody, collection, administration, winding up, and liquidation of such property and business as shall from time to time be conferred upon him by the court.

History.

1957, c. 1429, s. 6; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1.

§ 53-188.
Review of regulations, order or act of Commission or Commissioner.

The Commission may review any rule, regulation, order or act of the Commissioner done pursuant to or with respect to the provisions of this Article. Any person aggrieved by any such rule, regulation, order or act may appeal, pursuant to

G.S. 53C-2-6(b)

, to the Commission for review upon giving notice in writing within 20 days after such rule, regulation, order or act complained of is adopted, issued or done. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any aggrieved party to a decision of the Commission shall be entitled to petition for judicial review pursuant to

G.S. 53C-2-6(b)

.

History.

1957, c. 1429, s. 6; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 13; 1995, c. 129, s. 29; 2009-57, s. 2; 2012-56, s. 13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-57, s. 2, effective June 5, 2009, in the first sentence, substituted “may review” for “shall have full authority to review” near the beginning, and substituted “Article. Any” for “Article and any” at the end; in the second sentence, inserted “pursuant to

G.S. 53-92

(d)”; and in the third sentence, substituted “petition for judicial review pursuant to

G.S. 53-92

(d)” for “an appeal pursuant to G.S. 53-92” at the end.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 13, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53C-2-6(b)” for “G.S. 53-92(d)” in two places.

§ 53-189.
Insurance.

Credit life, credit accident and health, credit unemployment, and credit property insurance may be written in accordance with the provisions of Article 57 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.

The premium or cost of credit life, credit accident and health, credit unemployment, or credit property insurance, when written by or through any lender or other creditor, its affiliate, associate or subsidiary shall not be deemed as interest or charges or consideration or an amount in excess of permitted charges in connection with the loan or credit transaction and any gain or advantage to any lender or other creditor, its affiliate, associate or subsidiary, arising out of the premium or commission or dividend from the sale or provision of such insurance shall not be deemed a violation of any other law, general or special, civil or criminal, of this State, or of any rule, regulation or order issued by any regulatory authority of this State.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, s. 25; 1975, c. 660, s. 2; 1981, c. 759, s. 10; c. 876; 1987, c. 826, s. 10; 1993, c. 226, s. 14.

§ 53-190.
Loans made elsewhere.

No loan contract made outside this State in the amount or of the value of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less, for which greater consideration or charges than are authorized by

G.S. 53-173

and

G.S. 53-176

of this Article have been charged, contracted for, or received, shall be enforced in this State. Provided, the foregoing shall not apply to loan contracts in which all contractual activities, including solicitation, discussion, negotiation, offer, acceptance, signing of documents, and delivery and receipt of funds, occur entirely outside North Carolina.

If any lender or agent of a lender who makes loan contracts outside this State in the amount or of the value of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less, comes into this State to solicit or otherwise conduct activities in regard to such loan contracts, then such lender shall be subject to the requirements of this Article.

No lender licensed to do business under this Article may collect, or cause to be collected, any loan made by a lender in another state to a borrower, who was a legal resident of North Carolina at the time the loan was made. The purchase of a loan account shall not alter this prohibition.

History.

1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1967, c. 769, s. 2; 1969, c. 1303, s. 13; 1973, c. 1042, s. 8; 1979, c. 706, s. 2; 1989, c. 17, s. 11; 2015-179, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-179, s. 5, effective September 1, 2015, substituted “fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000)” for “ten thousand dollars ($10,000)” in subsections (a) and (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For note on choice of law rules in North Carolina, see 48 N.C.L. Rev. 243 (1970).

§ 53-191.
Businesses exempted.

Nothing in this Article shall be construed to apply to any person, firm or corporation doing business under the authority of any law of this State or of the United States relating to banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, cooperative credit unions, agricultural credit corporations or associations organized under the laws of North Carolina, production credit associations organized under the act of Congress known as the Farm Credit Act of 1933, pawnbrokers lending or advancing money on specific articles of personal property, industrial banks, the business of negotiating loans on real estate as defined in

G.S. 105-41

, nor to installment paper dealers as defined in

G.S. 105-83

other than persons, firms and corporations engaged in the business of accepting fees for endorsing or otherwise securing loans or contracts for repayment of loans.

History.

1955, c. 1279; 1957, c. 1429, s. 8; 1961, c. 1053, s. 1; 1969, c. 1303, s. 26.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on usury law in North Carolina, see 47 N.C.L. Rev. 761 (1969).